Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Licenses to Traffic in Alcoholic Beverages
243.0341.
Proposal of ordinance authorizing by the drink sales of alcoholic beverages in restaurants and dining facilities containing seating for at least fifty persons — Qualifications — Conditions — Limited effect of ordinance.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the following local governments may elect to act under this section:

Any city or county that conducted an election under KRS 242.1244(2) prior to January 1, 2016, for by the drink sales of alcoholic beverages in restaurants and dining facilities seating one hundred (100) persons or more; or

Any city with limited sale precincts created pursuant to KRS

242.1292

prior to July 14, 2022.

Upon a determination by the legislative body of a city or county that:

An economic hardship exists within the city or county; and

Expanded sales of alcoholic beverages by the drink could aid in economic growth;

the city or county may, after conducting a public hearing that is noticed to the public in accordance with the KRS Chapter 424, adopt an ordinance authorizing by the drink sales of alcoholic beverages in restaurants and dining facilities containing seating for at least fifty (50) persons and meeting the requirements of subsection (3) of this section.

The ordinance enacted by a city or county pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages under the following limitations:

Sales shall only be conducted in restaurants and other dining facilities meeting the requirements of KRS 241.010(37)(a); and

The provisions of KRS

243.034

shall apply to any restaurant or dining facility operating under a license issued pursuant to this section.

A city or county acting under this section may allow limited restaurant sales as defined in KRS 241.010(37).

The enactment of an ordinance under this section shall not:

Modify the city’s or county’s ability to issue a limited restaurant license to restaurants or other dining facilities meeting the requirements of KRS 241.010(37)(b); or

Affect, alter, or otherwise impair any license previously issued to a restaurant or dining facility meeting the requirements of KRS 241.010(37)(b).

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 80, § 3, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 35, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 7, effective July 15, 2020; 2022 ch. 39, § 15, effective March 29, 2022; 2022 ch. 104, § 5, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 39 and 104, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

243.035.
Bottling house or bottling house storage license.

The distilled spirits administrator may issue a bottling house or bottling house storage license only to persons who are authorized under this chapter to store or warehouse distilled spirits or wine. The bottling house or bottling house storage license shall authorize the licensee to bottle and store distilled spirits on the premises designated in the license. The holder of a bottling house or bottling house storage license may also hold a distilled spirits and wine storage license.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1944, ch. 154, § 31; 1998, ch. 518, § 7, effective April 13, 1998; 2013, ch. 121, § 48, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 36, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.036.
Special temporary distilled spirits and wine auction license.

A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license may be issued to a charitable or nonprofit organization.

A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall authorize the holder to:

Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver alcoholic beverages to be sold by auction or raffle or consumed at charity or nonprofit events;

Purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, and deliver limited specially labeled bottles of alcoholic beverages to be sold at charity or nonprofit events;

Obtain alcoholic beverages from distillers, rectifiers, wineries, small farm wineries, brewers, microbreweries, wholesalers, distributors, retailers, or any other person, by gift or donation, for the purpose of charity or nonprofit events; and

Receive payment for alcoholic beverages sold at events.

Each alcoholic beverage auction or raffle conducted by a charitable organization shall be subject to all restrictions and limitations contained in KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and the administrative regulations issued under those chapters and shall be authorized only on the days and only during the hours that the sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the county or municipality.

The location at which the alcoholic beverages are auctioned, raffled, or consumed under this section shall not constitute a public place for the purpose of KRS Chapter 222. Charitable or nonprofit events may be conducted on licensed or unlicensed premises. The charitable organization possessing a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall post a copy of the license at the location of the event.

A special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license shall not be issued for any period longer than thirty (30) days.

Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, a distiller, rectifier, winery, small farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, wholesaler, distributor, or retailer may donate, give away, or deliver any of its products to a charitable or nonprofit organization possessing a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license under this section.

All restrictions and prohibitions applying to an alcoholic beverage retail package and alcoholic beverage by the drink license, not inconsistent with this section, shall apply to a special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 44, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 518, § 8, effective April 13, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 563, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 49, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 8, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 37, effective June 29, 2017.

243.037.
Supplemental bar license — Main bar and service bars — Fees.

Except as where specifically authorized by statute, a retailer licensed to sell distilled spirits or wine by the drink shall only be permitted to sell or serve distilled spirits and wine by the drink at one (1) main bar, counter, or similar contrivance at the licensed premises.

A retailer may have necessary service bars, if they are not located in any room in which the members or guests or patrons of the place are invited or permitted to come. No distilled spirits or wine shall be served at service bars.

A supplemental bar license shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve distilled spirits and wine by the drink at retail from an additional location other than the main bar. A supplemental bar license is a nonquota license and shall not be transferable to other premises.

The

fee for a supplemental license shall be the same as the fee for the primary license authorizing retail distilled spirits and wine drink sales for each of up to five (5) supplemental bar licenses. There shall be no fee for each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same premises.

A license authorizing retail malt beverage sales, by the drink or by the package, authorizes the licensee to sell and serve malt beverages at any location on the licensed premises without obtaining a supplemental bar license.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 20, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 179, § 8, effective January 1, 2007; 2013, ch. 121, § 50, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 38, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/25/2013). 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 121, sec. 50, made changes to subsection (3) of this statute. It is apparent from consultation with the drafter, examination of the bill folder, and from context that the second use of the phrase “sell and serve malt beverages” should have been deleted from subsection (3), now subsection (5). The Reviser of Statutes has deleted the phrase “may sell and serve malt beverages” under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

243.038.
Agreement of golf course to comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 344.

The Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control shall not issue a license to an applicant authorized to apply for a license to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink under KRS

243.039

unless the applicant and the golf course, if different from the applicant, agree to voluntarily comply with the provisions of KRS Chapter 344, whether or not the applicant and the golf course would otherwise be covered by the provisions of KRS Chapter 344.

The department shall revoke or suspend any license issued under KRS

243.039

if the department or the Kentucky Commission on Human Rights makes a finding that the applicant or the golf course, if different from the applicant, has violated a requirement specified in this section.

History.

Repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 12, effective June 25, 2013.

243.039.
Business authorized by limited golf course license within wet territory or certain moist precincts — Package sales prohibited.

A limited golf course license may be issued to an establishment that is a nine (9) or an eighteen (18) hole golf course that meets United States Golf Association criteria as a regulation golf course as long as the establishment is within:

Any wet territory; or

Any moist precinct that has specifically authorized the sale of distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at that establishment under KRS

242.123

.

A limited golf course license shall authorize the licensee to purchase, receive, possess, and sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages at retail by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises. The licensee shall purchase distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages only from licensed wholesalers or distributors. The license shall not authorize the licensee to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages by the package.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 38, effective June 25, 2013.

243.040.
Malt beverage licenses — Kinds — Fees.

The following kinds of malt beverage licenses may be issued by the malt beverages administrator, the fees for which shall be:

Brewer’s license, per annum . . . . . $2,580.00

Microbrewery license, per annum . . . . . $520.00

Distributor’s license, per annum . . . . . $520.00

Nonquota retail malt beverage package license, per annum . . . . . $210.00

Out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license, per annum . . . . . $1,550.00

Malt beverage storage license, per annum . . . . . $260.00

Replacement or duplicate license, per annum . . . . . $25.00

Limited out-of-state malt beverage supplier’s license, per annum . . . . . $260.00

Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license, per annum . . . . . $210.00

Direct shipper license, per annum . . . . . $100.00

The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may obtain a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The holder of a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license may obtain a nonquota retail malt beverage package license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

A nonrefundable fee of sixty dollars ($60) shall be charged to process each new transitional license pursuant to KRS

243.045

.

Other special licenses as the state board finds to be necessary for the administration of KRS Chapters 241 to 244 and for the proper regulation and control of the trafficking in malt beverages, as provided for by administrative regulations promulgated by the state board.

A nonrefundable application fee of fifty dollars ($50) shall be charged to process each new application for a license under this section. The application fee shall be applied to the licensing fee if the license is issued, or otherwise the fee shall be retained by the department.

History.

2554b-197: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 168, § 18; 1976, ch. 368, § 1; 1978, ch. 194, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 395, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1998, ch. 518, § 2, effective April 13, 1998; 1998, ch. 522, § 25, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 20, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 79, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 99, § 4, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 564, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 121, § 51, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 39, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 80, § 8, effective July 15, 2020; 2020 ch. 102, § 5, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2020). This statute was amended by 2020 Ky. Acts chs. 80 and 102, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

243.042.
Qualified historic site license.

A qualified historic site license may be issued to any establishment meeting the criteria established in KRS

241.010

as long as the establishment is within:

Any wet territory; or

Any precinct that has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages under KRS

242.1242

.

A qualified historic site license shall authorize the licensee to:

Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink at one (1) or more permanent or nonpermanent locations on the premises over which the licensee, by lease or ownership, has exclusive control without obtaining additional supplemental bar licenses prescribed by KRS

243.037

;

Sell alcoholic beverages by the drink to patrons at public or private functions held on the premises; and

Purchase and store alcoholic beverages in the manner prescribed in KRS

243.088

,

243.250

, and

244.260

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 99, § 5, effective June 26, 2007; 2012, ch. 125, § 11, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 121, § 52, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 6, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 40, effective June 29, 2017.

243.045.
Issuance of transitional license by State administrator or administrators — Limitations on use.

A transitional license may be issued by the state administrator or administrators during the time a transfer of an ongoing business is being processed under the following conditions:

The purchaser shall file an application for a permanent license with the appropriate local alcoholic beverage authority and with the department;

The purchaser shall advertise its intention to apply for a license pursuant to KRS

243.360

; and

The purchaser shall pay all application fees for the permanent license.

If the above requirements are met, the state administrator or administrators, as appropriate, may issue a transitional license with a term of up to sixty (60) days, plus one (1) thirty (30) day renewal license, to the purchaser for a processing fee set forth in KRS

243.030

to

243.040

. All transitional licenses immediately expire upon the issuance to the purchaser of one (1) or more permanent licenses.

Upon completion of the sale of the business, the purchaser shall not operate the business on the seller’s license.

The transitional license shall not be transferable or used for an application to move a business from one (1) location to another location.

The transitional license shall entitle the holder to the same privileges and restrictions of the permanent license or licenses for which the holder applied under subsection (1)(a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 79, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 565, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 62, § 41, effective June 29, 2017.

243.050.
Extended hours supplemental license — Sunday retail drink license.

The state administrators may issue an extended hours supplemental license for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink to the holder of an NQ1 retail drink license, a qualified historic site license, or a license located in a commercial airport. The board may, by administrative regulation or special conditions of an extended hours supplemental license, establish the days when the supplemental license will be valid, including Sundays, and establish any restrictions on the use of the license to ensure that it will be primarily for the benefit of holders of NQ1 retail drink licenses, qualified historic site licenses, and visitors at large commercial airports.

A licensee located in territory which has authorized Sunday retail distilled spirits and wine drink sales under KRS

244.290

, either by local option election or by local government ordinance, shall obtain a Sunday retail drink license in order to sell distilled spirits and wine on Sunday.

A retail licensee holding a Sunday retail drink license is authorized to remain open and sell distilled spirits and wine by the drink for consumption on the premises only during those times and hours permitted by local government ordinance.

A licensee located in territory that has authorized Sunday retail distilled spirits and wine package sales under KRS

244.290

or retail malt beverage package or drink sales under KRS

244.480

is not required to hold a Sunday retail drink license to authorize these sales.

HISTORY:

2554b-115; amend. Acts 1976, ch. 380, § 1; 1982, ch. 340, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 522, § 26, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 69, § 1, effective March 6, 2000; 2000, ch. 435, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 218, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 99, § 6, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 566, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 53, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 7, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 62, § 42, effective June 29, 2017.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the fee formerly imposed by this section is $100, a city cannot levy a license fee of more than $200 per annum on a malt beverage distributor under KRS

243.070

.

OAG 70-454

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint Against Tavern and Driver by Pedestrian Struck by Intoxicated Driver on Sidewalk, Failure to Keep Control of Vehicle, Form 135.06.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint by Minor Against Liquor Store That Sold Liquor to Minor Who Subsequently Had One Car Accident, Form 132.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint by Third Party Against Liquor Store That Sold Liquor to Minor Who Caused Automobile Accident, Form 132.02.

243.055.
Hotel in-room service license.

As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

“Hotel” means any hotel, motel, inn, or other establishment which offers overnight accommodations to the public for hire;

“In-room service” means the delivery of alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages by an employee of the hotel to a registered guest’s room when the alcoholic beverages have been ordered by a guest and when the guest shall be billed for the cost of the alcoholic beverages at the time of delivery, with all sales of the alcoholic beverages being completed upon delivery; and, additionally, the provision of a cabinet or other facility located in a hotel guest’s room which contains alcoholic beverages and which is provided upon written request of the guest and which is accessible by lock and key or remote control device only to the guest, with the sale of the alcoholic beverages contained therein being final at the time requested, except for a credit which may be given to the guest for any unused portion. The licensee may stock a cabinet or other facility located in a hotel guest’s room pursuant to this section, with fifty (50) milliliter containers of distilled spirits.

The department may issue a hotel in-room service license to any hotel which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages upon the payment of the fee set forth in KRS

243.030

. The license shall authorize the licensee to sell distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages by in-room service. The sale of alcoholic beverages by in-room service shall be subject to all restrictions and limitations contained in KRS Chapters 241 to 244, and the administrative regulations issued under those chapters, and shall be authorized only on the days and only during the hours as the sale of alcoholic beverages is otherwise authorized in the county or municipality. All alcoholic beverages sold pursuant to this section shall be considered by the drink sales and shall be subject to all state and local taxes imposed on alcoholic beverages and shall be purchased from a licensed wholesaler and distributor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 228, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 518, § 9, effective April 13, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 567, effective July 15, 2010.

243.060.
County and consolidated local government licenses — Kinds — Fees — Restrictions on increase of fees.

The fiscal court of any county or a consolidated local government in which traffic in alcoholic beverages is permitted under KRS Chapter 242 may only issue the following alcoholic beverage licenses and corresponding maximum fees. The license fees are subject to the provisions of subsections (2) to (4) of this section, and shall not exceed the following:

Quota retail package license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,200.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Quota retail drink license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,600.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Nonquota type 2 retail drink license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,800.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Nonquota type 3 retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $300.00

Special temporary license, per event:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $266.66

In all other counties . . . . . $166.66

Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $300.00

Nonquota retail malt beverage package license, per annum . . . . . $400.00

Nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license, per annum . . . . . $400.00

Limited restaurant license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $2,000.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,400.00

Limited golf course license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $2,000.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,400.00

Authorized public consumption license, per annum . . . . . $250.00

Qualified historic site license, per annum . . . . . $1,030.00

The fee for the following license types may not be increased by more than five percent (5%) above the January 1, 2013, fee for the current license or the former license type listed beside it, during any five (5) year period. The fees for the licenses described in this subsection are still subject to the maximum amounts listed for those licenses in subsection (1) of this section:

Quota retail package license: retail package liquor license;

Quota retail drink license: retail drink license;

Nonquota type 2 retail drink license: restaurant drink license;

Nonquota retail malt beverage package license: retail malt beverage license;

Nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license: retail malt beverage license;

Limited restaurant license; and

Limited golf course license.

The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the same as the fee for the primary drink license. There shall be no charge for each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same premises.

The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may obtain a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The holder of a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license may obtain a nonquota retail malt beverage package license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

A county shall not issue county licenses or impose fees under this section to any person who holds a city license issued under KRS

243.070

.

HISTORY:

2554b-112, 2554b-221: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 335, § 2; 1978, ch. 432, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 518, § 4, effective April 13, 1998; 2002, ch. 346, § 219, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 20, § 7, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 121, § 54, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 9, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 62, § 43, effective June 29, 2017.

243.070.
City and consolidated local government licenses — Kinds — Fees — Restriction on increase of fees.

The legislative body of any city or a consolidated local government in which traffic in alcoholic beverages is permitted under KRS Chapter 242 may only issue the following alcoholic beverage licenses and corresponding maximum fees. The license fees are subject to the provisions of subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, and shall not exceed the amounts specified in this subsection:

Distiller’s license, per annum . . . . . $500.00

Rectifier’s license:

Class A, per annum . . . . . $3,000.00

Class B (craft rectifier), per annum . . . . . $960.00

Wholesaler’s distilled spirits and wine license, per annum . . . . . $3,000.00

Quota retail package license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,200.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Quota retail drink license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,600.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Special temporary license, per event:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $266.66

In all other counties . . . . . $166.66

Nonquota type 1 retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $2,000.00

Nonquota type 2 retail drink license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,800.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,000.00

Nonquota type 3 retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $300.00

Special temporary alcoholic beverage auction license, per event . . . . . $100.00

Special Sunday retail drink license, per annum . . . . . $300.00

Extended hours supplemental license, per annum . . . . . $2,000.00

Caterer’s license, per annum . . . . . $800.00

Bottling house or bottling house storage license, per annum . . . . . $1,000.00

Brewer’s license, per annum . . . . . $500.00

Microbrewery license, per annum . . . . . $500.00

Malt beverage distributor’s license, per annum . . . . . $400.00

Nonquota retail malt beverage package license, per annum . . . . . $200.00

Nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license, per annum . . . . . $200.00

Limited restaurant license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,800.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,200.00

Limited golf course license, per annum:

In counties containing a consolidated local government . . . . . $1,800.00

In all other counties . . . . . $1,200.00

Authorized public consumption license, per annum . . . . . $250.00

Qualified historic site license, per annum . . . . . $1,030.00

The fee for the following license types may not be increased by more than five percent (5%) above the January 1, 2013, fee for the current license or the former license type listed beside it, during any five (5) year period. The fees for the licenses described in this subsection are still subject to the maximum amounts listed for those licenses in subsection (1) of this section:

Quota retail package license: retail package liquor license;

Quota retail drink license: retail drink license;

Nonquota type 1 retail drink license: convention center or convention hotel complex license;

Nonquota type 2 retail drink license: restaurant drink license;

Nonquota retail malt beverage package license: retail malt beverage license;

Nonquota type 4 retail malt beverage drink license: retail malt beverage license;

Limited restaurant license; and

Limited golf course license.

The fee for each of the first five (5) supplemental bar licenses shall be the same as the fee for the primary drink license. There shall be no charge for each supplemental license issued in excess of five (5) to the same licensee at the same premises.

The holder of a nonquota retail malt beverage package license may obtain a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50). The holder of a Nonquota type 4 malt beverage drink license may obtain a nonquota retail malt beverage package license for a fee of fifty dollars ($50).

HISTORY:

2554b-113: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 335, § 3; 1978, ch. 384, § 99, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 432, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 60, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 109, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 95, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 518, § 5, effective April 13, 1998; 2000, ch. 69, § 3, effective March 6, 2000; 2000, ch. 435, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 220, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 20, § 8, effective July 13, 2004; 2013, ch. 121, § 55, effective June 25, 2013; 2016 ch. 80, § 10, effective July 15, 2016; repealed and reenacted 2017, ch. 62, § 44, effective June 29, 2017.

243.072.
Economic hardship determinations for regulatory ordinances by a city with population of 3,000 to 7,999 — Administrative regulations — Exemption from population requirements. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 121, § 31, effective June 25, 2013; repealed by 2017 ch. 62, § 119, effective June 29, 2017.

243.075.
Eligible city or county may impose regulatory license fee up to five percent on gross receipts of each establishment’s sale of alcoholic beverages — Annual levies — Credits — Applicability of county regulatory license fee if city levies license fee — Enactment of fee within two years following election — Administrative regulations — Use of revenue received from regulatory license fee — Penalties for violation — Party suing city or county for violation responsible for attorney fees if city or county found not to be in violation — Regulatory fee imposed before 2019 permitted to continue at existing rate — Applicability to direct shipper licensee — Report to department.

A city with a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, or a county that does not contain a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, or a county that contains a city authorized to impose a fee under subsection (9) of this section, that is wet through a local option election held under KRS Chapter 242 is authorized to impose a regulatory license fee not to exceed five percent (5%) upon the gross receipts of the sale of alcoholic beverages of each establishment located in the city or county licensed to sell alcoholic beverages.

The regulatory license fee may be levied at the beginning of each budget period at a percentage rate that is reasonably estimated to fully reimburse the local government for the estimated costs of any additional policing, regulatory, or administrative expenses related to the sale of alcoholic beverages in the city and county.

The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or licenses permitted by law, except:

A credit against a regulatory license fee shall be allowed in an amount equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city or county pursuant to KRS

243.060

or

243.070

; and

In a county in which the city and county both levy a regulatory license fee, the county license fee shall only be applicable outside the jurisdictional boundaries of those cities which levy a license fee.

A city or county that is moist through a local option election held under KRS

242.1244

may by ordinance impose a regulatory license fee upon the gross receipts of the sale of alcoholic beverages of each establishment located in the city or county and licensed to sell alcoholic beverages by the drink for consumption on the premises.

The regulatory license fee may be levied annually at a rate that is reasonably estimated to fully reimburse the city or county for the estimated costs for any additional policing, regulatory, or administrative related expenses.

The regulatory license fee shall be in addition to any other taxes, fees, or licenses permitted by law, but a credit against the fee shall be allowed in an amount equal to any licenses or fees imposed by the city or county pursuant to KRS

243.060

or

243.070

.

In a county in which the city and county both levy a regulatory license fee, the county license fee shall only be applicable outside the jurisdictional boundaries of those cities which levy a license fee.

For any election held after July 15, 2014, any new fee authorized under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be enacted by the city or county no later than two (2) years from the date of the local option election held under KRS Chapter 242.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, any city or county that held a local option election between July 15, 2014, and July 15, 2018, may enact a regulatory licensing fee in accordance with subsection (1) of this section within two (2) years of June 29, 2021.

After July 15, 2014, any fee authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be established at a rate that will generate revenue that does not exceed the total of the reasonable expenses actually incurred by the city or county in the immediately previous fiscal year for the additional cost, as demonstrated by reasonable evidence, of:

Policing;

Regulation; and

Administration;

as a result of the sale of alcoholic beverages within the city or county.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate administrative regulations which set forth the process by which a city or county, in the first year following the discontinuance of prohibition, may estimate any additional policing, regulation, and administrative expenses by a city or county directly and solely related to the discontinuance of prohibition. This subsection shall apply to any discontinuance of prohibition occurring after the promulgation of administrative regulations required by this subsection.

After the first year, the regulatory license fee for each subsequent year shall conform to the requirements of subsection (4) of this section.

The revenue received from the imposition of the regulatory license fee authorized under subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall be:

Deposited into a segregated fund of the city or county;

Spent only in accordance with the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section; and

Audited under an annual audit performed pursuant to KRS

43.070

,

64.810

, and

91A.040

.

Any city or county found by a court to have violated the provisions of this section shall:

Provide a refund as determined by the court to any licensee that has been harmed in an amount equal to its prorated portion of the excess revenues collected by the city or county that are directly attributable to a violation occurring after July 15, 2014;

Be responsible for the payment of the reasonable attorney fees directly incurred by a party to a litigation in an amount ordered by the court upon its finding of an intentional and willful violation of this section by a city or county occurring after July 15, 2014; and

Upon the finding by a court of a second intentional and willful violation of the provisions of this section, lose the ability to impose the regulatory fee provided by this section for a period of five (5) years and, upon the finding by a court of a third intentional and willful violation, forfeit the right to impose the regulatory license fee authorized by this section.

Any party bringing suit against a city or county for an alleged violation of this section occurring after July 15, 2014, shall be responsible for the payment of the reasonable attorney fees of the city or county in an amount determined by the court upon a finding by the court that the city or county did not violate this section.

Any city that does not meet the population requirements of subsection (1) of this section, and any county that has a city exceeding the population requirements of subsection (1) of this section, that imposed a regulatory license fee pursuant to this section as of January 1, 2019, shall be deemed to meet the requirements for doing so set out in this section and may continue to impose the regulatory license fee previously established pursuant to this section.

Any city or county that is authorized to impose the regulatory license fee under subsection (1) of this section, or under paragraph (a) of this subsection, that imposed the regulatory license fee at a rate higher than five percent (5%) prior to June 27, 2019, may continue to impose the regulatory license fee at a rate that exceeds five percent (5%). The rate shall continue to be calculated annually pursuant to the requirements of this section and shall not exceed the rate that was imposed by the city or county on January 1, 2019.

A direct shipper licensee shall be subject to and remit the regulatory license fee imposed by this section as though it were an establishment located in a city or county licensed to sell alcoholic beverages. This fee shall be considered a tax as defined in KRS

243.029

.

Any city or county imposing a regulatory license fee under this section shall file with the department a report showing the applicable fee amount and remittance address for each affected license type in its jurisdiction on or before August 1, 2020. Any adoption of this fee after July 15, 2020, or modification of the applicable fee amount or remittance address for each affected licensee shall be reported to the department within thirty (30) days of adoption by the city or county imposing the fee. Within twenty (20) days after receipt of the information, the department shall compile and publish the information so that it is readily available to the public.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 434, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 121, § 38, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 435, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2013, ch. 121, § 56, effective June 25, 2013; 2014, ch. 22, § 9, effective July 15, 2014; ch. 39, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 92, § 297, effective January 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 62, § 45, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 53, § 1, effective June 27, 2019; 2020 ch. 80, § 9, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 156, § 27, effective July 1, 2021; 2021 ch. 48, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/1/2021). This statute was amended by
2021 Ky. Acts. chs. 48 and
156, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(1/1/2015). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 22, 39, and 92. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 92, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

243.080.
Credit for local licenses on state retail licenses. [Repealed.]